District of Columbia statutes.
16-2823

Mediators.

(a)

The court shall assign the parties to court-provided mediation and provide a roster of medical malpractice mediators from which the parties may hire an eligible medical malpractice mediator. In the alternative, all parties can agree to hire another individual outside the roster. To be eligible for inclusion in the roster of medical malpractice mediators, an individual shall be a judge or lawyer with at least 10 years of significant experience in medical malpractice litigation.

(b)

If the parties cannot agree on the selection of a mediator, the court shall appoint one.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807